Louisiana, session 2026, SB53.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 14:107.3(A)(3) and (A)(3)(a) and (c)
are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§107.3. Criminal blighting of property
A. The terms used in this Section shall have the following meanings:
* * *
(3) "Public nuisance" means any garage, shed, barn, house, building,
apartment, or structure, that by reason of the condition in which it is permitted to
remain, may endanger the health, life, limb, or property of any person, or cause any
hurt, harm, damages, injury, or loss to any person in any one or more of the
following conditions:
(a) The property is dilapidated, decayed, unsafe, or unsanitary, is detrimental
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-262 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 53
to health, morals, safety, public welfare, and the well-being of the community,
endangers life or property, or is conducive to ill health, delinquency, and crime.
* * *
(c) The conditions present on the property and its surrounding grounds are
not reasonably or adequately maintained, thereby causing deterioration and creating
a blighting influence or condition on nearby properties and thereby depreciating the
value, use, and enjoyment to such an extent that it is harmful to the public health,
welfare, morals, safety, and the economic stability of the area, community, or
neighborhood in which such public nuisance is located.
* * *